Massachusetts, session 194th, H3685.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Route 1, Route 20 and Route
6 in the Commonwealth shall be designated and known as historic United States Routes. The
Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain suitable markers bearing
that designation in compliance with standards of the department.
of 1